Illinois, session 104th, HB1416.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)7    Sec. 2HHHH. Internet domain name; grace period.8    (a) As used in this Section, "Internet domain name" refers 9to a globally unique, hierarchical reference to an Internet 10host or service, assigned through centralized Internet naming 11authorities, comprising a series of character strings 12separated by periods, with the right-most string specifying 13the top of the hierarchy.14    (b) A person who hosts or registers an Internet domain 15name to a person located in this State shall not sell or lease 16the Internet domain name to another person for a period of 5 17years after the buyer or lessee ends his or her ownership or 18lease of the Internet domain name. A buyer or lessee who ends 19his or her ownership or lease agreement shall have the right to 20repurchase or renew the lease for the Internet domain name 21during the 5-year period for the cost the buyer or lessee would 22have owed to the host or registrar if the ownership or lease 23agreement had not ended.  HB1416- 2 -LRB104 07621 SPS 17665 b1    (c) Any person who violates this Section commits an 2unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act.